Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-806
Board members; oath; bond.

Each of the members of a board of public works of a city of the second class shall take an oath to discharge faithfully the duties of his or her office before entering upon the discharge of such office. Each of the members of such board before entering upon the duties of his or her office shall be required to give bond to the city with corporate surety. Such bond shall be in the sum of five thousand dollars and shall be conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of member of the board of public works; and the surety on such bond shall be approved by the mayor and city council and shall be filed with the city treasurer. The premium on such bond shall be paid out of any public utility fund designated by the mayor and city council.

Laws 1935, c. 33, § 4, p. 140;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-704;

R.S.1943, § 17-806;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 235.